Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-112
Division; airways system.

It may designate, design, establish, expand or modify a state airways system which will best serve the interests of the state. It may chart such airways system and arrange for the publication and distribution of such maps, charts, notices and bulletins, relating to such airways, as may be required in the public interest. The system shall be supplementary to and coordinated in design and operation with the federal airways system. It may include all types of air navigation facilities, whether publicly or privately owned; Provided, that such facilities conform to federal safety standards.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(6), p. 84.